Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-373
Cost of patient care; determination; redetermination annually.

Any determination of the ability of a patient or relative to pay shall remain in effect until a redetermination is made. A redetermination shall be made annually and at such additional times when, in the judgment of the department, it is appropriate to do so, or when a request is made by the patient or relative who is liable for the payments.

Laws 1969, c. 812, § 11, p. 3054;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 793.